South Dakota, session 2026, SB130.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. There is appropriated $8,000,000 from the general fund to the South Dakota
Ellsworth Development Authority, for the purpose of funding public roadway and related
infrastructure improvements required because of construction activity occurring on Ellsworth
Air Force Base.
Section 2. The moneys appropriated in section 1 of this Act must be used for public roadway
and related infrastructure improvements necessary to support, mitigate, and address impacts
from construction activity occurring on Ellsworth Air Force Base.
Eligible uses include: roadway reconstruction, rehabilitation, widening, capacity
improvements, traffic safety enhancements and mitigation measures, engineering, design,
traffic studies, construction oversight, inspection, and industry-standard roadway analysis.
Section 3. On or before July thirty-first, the authority shall submit a report to the Governor's
Office of Economic Development, the Legislative Research Council, and the Department of
Legislative Audit listing, for the preceding fiscal year, each award recipient, the amount of
each award, and the purpose of each award.
Section 4. The South Dakota Ellsworth Development Authority may not spend more than
three percent of the total appropriation on administrative expenses.
Section 5. The executive director of the South Dakota Ellsworth Development Authority shall
approve vouchers and the state auditor shall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized
in this Act.

26.757.10 2 130
Section 6. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated by July
1, 2040, shall revert in accordance with the procedures prescribed in chapter 4-8.
Section 7. Whereas, this Act is necessary for the support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act shall be in
full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.
SB130 ENROLLED

26.757.10 3 130
An Act to make an appropriation for roadway and related infrastructure improvements
required because of construction activity at Ellsworth Air Force Base and to declare an
emergency.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 130
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 130 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB130 ENROLLED